Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201454-1161
License required;
application for license; contents.

No person shall
conduct or operate a livestock auction market unless he or she holds a market
license therefor, upon which the current annual market license fee has been
paid. Any person making application for a new market license shall do so to
the director in writing, verified by the applicant, on a form prescribed by
the department, showing the following:

(1) The name and address of the applicant with a statement
of the names and addresses of all persons having any financial interest in
the applicant and the amount of such interest;

(2) Financial responsibility of the applicant in the form
of a statement of all assets and liabilities;

(3) A legal description of the property and its exact location
with a complete description of the facilities proposed to be used in connection
with such livestock auction market;

(4) The schedule of charges an applicant proposes for all services proposed
to be rendered; and

(5) A detailed statement of the facts upon which the applicant
relies showing the general confines of the trade area proposed to be served
by such livestock auction market, the benefits to be derived by the livestock
industry, and the services proposed to be rendered.

Such application shall be accompanied by the annual fee as
prescribed in section 54-1165.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 5, p. 964;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 134;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 24.